Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.060

License issuance—Display.

Upon passing an examination and meeting the requirements as provided in RCW 18.29.021, the secretary of health shall issue to the successful applicant a license as dental hygienist. The license shall be displayed in a conspicuous place in the operation room where such licensee shall practice.

[ 1991 c 3 s 48; 1989 c 202 s 12; 1985 c 7 s 21; 1981 c 277 s 4; 1979 c 158 s 32; 1923 c 16 s 31; RRS s 10030-31.]